Tennessee, session 114, HB1287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-6-106(f), is amended by deleting
the language "fifteen (15) requests per calendar year" and substituting "twenty (20) requests per
calendar year".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1287
002988
- 1 -